Hawaii, session 2025, HB621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that there is a critical shortage of qualified English language learner educators in the State.  This shortage has a detrimental impact on the education of students whose primary language is not English.  To address this shortage and improve student outcomes, it is necessary to develop incentives to attract and retain qualified educators for the English language learner program to ensure that English language learners receive the support they need to succeed academically and reach their full potential.  Providing a pay differential to English language learner educators is a proven strategy to incentivize skilled professionals to enter and remain in the profession. The purpose of this Act is to require and fund pay differentials for English learner educators. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-     Differential pay for English learner educators.  (a)  Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the department shall pay a differential to any educator who provides direct services to English language learners and: (1)  Holds a valid license to teach English to speakers of other languages with an endorsement in teaching English as a second language; or (2)  Meets the equivalent requirement as determined by the department. (b)  The amount of the pay differential shall be $          ." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to fund pay differentials for English language educators. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act; provided that the sums appropriated shall not be released until a memorandum of understanding is executed between the superintendent of education and the exclusive representative of collective bargaining unit (5). SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________